Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 6. Office and Agent.

§ 13.1-634.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation shall continuously maintain in the Commonwealth:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who shall be:

An individual who is a resident of the Commonwealth and (i) either an officer or director of the corporation or (ii) a member of the Virginia State Bar and whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office; provided such a registered agent (i) shall not be its own registered agent and (ii) shall designate by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, one or more natural persons at the office of the registered agent upon whom any process, notice or demand may be served and shall continuously maintain at least one such person at that office. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

The sole duty of the registered agent is to forward to the corporation at its last known address any process, notice, or demand that is served on the registered agent.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-9; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 407; 1976, c. 4; 1985, c. 522; 1993, c. 113; 2000, c. 162; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2019, c. 734.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 162, in subdivision A 2 b, deleted “or” following “professional corporation,” inserted “or registered limited liability partnership” preceding “registered” and inserted “with the Virginia State Bar” thereafter.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and substituted “Commonwealth and either an officer” for “Commonwealth, is an officer” in subdivision a of subsection A; rewrote subdivision b of subsection A; and in subsection B, inserted “process” and “or demand.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 2 a., added the designations for clauses (i) and (ii); and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

§ 13.1-635.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A corporation may change its registered office or registered agent, by filing with the Commission a statement of change on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the corporation;

The address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new registered office, and the name of the city or county in which it is to be located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the corporation will be in compliance with the requirements of §

13.1-634

.

A statement of change shall forthwith be filed with the Commission by a corporation whenever its registered agent dies, resigns or ceases to satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-634

.

A corporation’s registered agent may sign a statement of change as required above if (i) the business address of the registered agent changes to another post office address within the Commonwealth or (ii) the name of the registered agent has been legally changed. A corporation’s new registered agent may sign and submit for filing a statement of change as required above if (a) the former registered agent is a business entity that has been merged into the new registered agent, (b) the instrument of merger is on record in the office of the clerk of the Commission, and (c) the new registered agent is an entity that is qualified to serve as a registered agent pursuant to §

13.1-634

. In either instance, the registered agent or surviving entity shall forthwith file a statement of change as required above, which shall recite that a copy of the statement of change shall be mailed to the principal office address of the corporation on or before the business day following the day on which the statement of change is filed.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-10; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1976, c. 4; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 622; 1987, c. 183; 1988, c. 405; 2003, c. 597; 2010, cc. 434, 782; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

For effect on corporate existence a failure to file a statement of change has on status of organization, see §

13.1-752

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 597 rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “If a registered agent changes his business address to another place within this Commonwealth, he shall change the address of the registered office of any corporation of which he is a registered agent by filing a statement as required above except that it need be signed, either manually or in facsimile, only by the registered agent and must recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed to the corporation.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “filing with” for “filing in the office of” and “prescribed and furnished” for “supplied”; in subsection B, substituted “filed with” for “filed in the office of”; and rewrote subsection C.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 deleted “either manually or in facsimile” following “need be signed” in subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “by filing” for “or both, upon filing”; in subsection C, substituted “statement of change” for “statement” five times.

§ 13.1-636.
Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign as agent for the corporation by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation stating (i) the name of the corporation, (ii) the name of the agent, and (iii) that the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the corporation. The statement of resignation shall be accompanied by a certification that the registered agent will have a copy of the statement mailed to the principal office of the corporation by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. When the statement of resignation takes effect, the registered office is also discontinued.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of (i) 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed with the Commission or (ii) the date on which a statement of change in accordance with §

13.1-635

to appoint a registered agent is filed with the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 434; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

For the effect failing to file a statement of change, following a resignation under this section, can have on the status of the corporation, see §

13.1-752

and note thereunder.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “the agency” for “his agency,” “a certification” for “his certification” and “the registered agent” for “he.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “a statement” for “his statement” and “shall mail” for “has mailed” and inserted “on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section, which read: “A. A registered agent may resign the agency appointment by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation accompanied by a certification that the registered agent shall mail a copy thereof to the principal office of the corporation by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. The statement of resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued. B. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “When the statement of resignation takes effect” for “The statement of resignation may include a statement that” in the last sentence of subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “to appoint a registered agent” in subsection B. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-637.
Service on corporation.

A corporation’s registered agent is the corporation’s agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the corporation. The registered agent may by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, designate a natural person or persons in the office of the registered agent upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served and may, by instrument in writing, authorize service of process by facsimile by the sheriff, provided acknowledgement of receipt of service is returned by facsimile to the sheriff. Whenever any person so designated by the registered agent accepts service of process or whenever service is by facsimile, a photographic copy of the instruments designating the person or authorizing the method of service and receipt shall be attached to the return.

Whenever a corporation fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this Commonwealth, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the clerk of the Commission shall be an agent of the corporation upon whom service may be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a corporation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-12, 13-14, 13.1-11; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 622; 1991, c. 672; 1995, c. 411; 2001, cc. 517, 541.

Cross references.

As to service on domestic corporations generally, see §

8.01-299

; for foreign corporations, see §

8.01-301

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in the second sentence of subsection A, inserted “natural” preceding “person or persons” and substituted “acknowledgement” for “acknowlegement.”

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 657 (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Process, § 23.